Oklahoma, session 2025, SB134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 914, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 914. A. The normal retirement date for a member of the


Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System shall be as defined in


Section 902 of this title, provided members employed on or after


January 1, 1983, shall have six (6) or more years of full-time-


equivalent employment with a participating employer before receiving


any retirement benefits or, if the member is a legislative session


employee of the Legislature, shall have three (3) or more years of


full-time-equivalent employment with a participating employer before

Req. No. 1056 Page 1

RBS No. 1056

receiving any retirement benefits. In no event shall a normal


retirement date for a member be before six (6) months after the


entry date of the participating employer by whom he or she is


employed.


B. A member may be employed beyond the normal retirement date


by the appointing authority of the participating employer. However,


the member may not receive retirement pay so long as the member


continues employment under this act Section 901 et seq. of this


title. Any member who has terminated employment with a


participating employer prior to the month immediately preceding said


the member’s normal retirement date must elect a vested benefit


pursuant to Section 917 of this title before receiving any


retirement benefits.


C. Notice for retirement shall be filed through the retirement


coordinator for the participating employer in such form and manner


as the Board Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System Board of


Trustees shall prescribe; provided, that such notice for retirement


shall be filed with the office of the retirement system at least


sixty (60) days prior to the date selected for the member’s


retirement; provided further, that the Executive Director may waive


the sixty-day notice for good cause shown as defined by the Board.


1. The participating employer shall provide the System with the


following information for a retiring member, no later than the



Req. No. 1056 Page 2

RBS No. 1056

fifteenth day of the month of retirement: last day physically on


the job; last day on payroll; and final unused sick leave balance.


2. Failure to submit this information by the deadline, or


errors in submitted information that result in a disqualification of


retirement eligibility, shall be the responsibility of the


participating employer. In cases where the error results in


disqualification of retirement eligibility, it is the participating


employer’s responsibility to reemploy the member, or retain the


member on the payroll, for time period required to reach


eligibility, not exceeding two (2) months.


D. No retirement benefits shall be payable to any member until


the first day of the month following the termination of the member’s


employment with any participating employer. The type of retirement


benefit selected by a member may not be changed on or after the


effective date of the member’s retirement. Receipt of workers’


compensation benefits shall in no respect disqualify the retiree for


benefits.


E. If a retiree should be elected or appointed to any position


or office for which compensation for service is paid from levies or


taxes imposed by the state or any political subdivision thereof, the


retiree shall not receive any retirement benefit for any month for


which the retiree serves in such position or office after the


retiree has received compensation in a sum equal to the amount


allowable as wages or earnings by the Social Security Administration

Req. No. 1056 Page 3

RBS No. 1056

in any calendar year. This subsection shall not apply to service


rendered by a retiree as a juror, as a witness in any legal


proceeding or action, as an election board judge or clerk, or in any


other office or position of a similar nature, or to an employer that


is not a participating employer. Provided, further, that any


participating employer who is employing such a retiree shall make


proper written notification to the System informing it of the


beginning date of such retiree’s employment and the date such


retiree reaches the maximum compensation allowed by this section in


the calendar year. Any retiree returning to work for a


participating employer shall make contributions to the System and


the employer shall do likewise. All retirees who have returned to


employment and participation in the System following retirement


shall have post-retirement benefits calculated on one of the


following methods:


1. All service accumulated from date of reemployment shall be


computed based on the benefit formula applicable at that time and


the additional benefits shall be added to the previous benefits.


Such additional benefits shall be calculated each year based upon


additional service accrued from July 1 to June 30 of the previous


year and the additional benefit, if any, will be added to the


retiree’s monthly benefit beginning January 1, 2000, and each


January 1 thereafter. However, the post-retirement service credit


shall be cumulative, beginning with service credit accrued after the

Req. No. 1056 Page 4

RBS No. 1056

date of retirement, provided that the retiree has not received a


distribution of the post-retirement contributions.;


2. Any retiree who returns to employment with a participating


employer may elect not to receive any retirement benefits while so


reemployed. If such an election is made and reemployment is for a


minimum period of thirty-six (36) consecutive months, all service


accumulated from date of reemployment shall be participating


service. For purposes of determining the retirement benefits of


such a member upon the termination of such reemployment all


creditable service of the member shall be computed based on the


benefit formula applicable at the time of termination of such


reemployment. Provided, a retiree who became reemployed prior to


July 1, 1982, and who is reemployed for a minimum of thirty-six (36)


consecutive months shall have all the creditable service of such


retiree computed based on the benefit formula applicable at the time


of termination of such reemployment if the retiree elects not to


receive retirement benefits prior to such termination of


reemployment. A retiree who has waived receipt of the monthly


benefit, but is not reemployed for the full thirty-six (36)


consecutive months, shall upon termination of such reemployment have


only the additional amount added to his or her benefit as if they


had not waived the benefit as provided in paragraph 1 of this


subsection.;



Req. No. 1056 Page 5

RBS No. 1056

3. All post-retirement additional benefits shall be calculated


using actual hours worked as well as the actual compensation


received and upon which contributions are paid. Post-retirement


service is not subject to the partial year round-up provisions of


subsection C of Section 913 of this title.; or


4. A retired member who returns to work for a participating


employer pursuant to this section shall be bound by the election


made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection A of Section 915 of


this title if the member had made such election prior to retirement.


If the member had not made such election prior to retirement, the


member may do so during the member’s reemployment with a


participating employer pursuant to this section. A retired member


may not be rehired by their former employer, nor may the retired


member be permitted to enter into an employment contract of any kind


with a former employer, for a period of one (1) year six months


after the retired member ended his or her employment with the former


employer unless the retired member waives his or her benefit under


paragraph 2 of this subsection and returns as a bona fide employee.


F. Except as otherwise provided by subsection G of this


section, any member may elect to retire before his or her normal


retirement date on the first day of any month coinciding with or


following the attainment of age fifty-five (55), provided such


member has completed ten (10) years of participating service, but in


no event before six (6) months after the entry date. Any member who

Req. No. 1056 Page 6

RBS No. 1056

shall retire before the normal retirement date shall receive an


annual retirement benefit adjusted in accordance with the following


percentage schedule:


Percentage of Normal


Age Retirement Benefit


100.00%


93.33%


86.67%


80.00%


73.33%


66.67%


63.33%


60.00%


G. Any member whose first participating service occurs on or


after November 1, 2011, may elect to retire before his or her normal


retirement date on the first day of any month coinciding with or


following the attainment of age sixty (60), provided such member has


completed ten (10) years of participating service, but in no event


before six (6) months after the entry date. Any member who shall


retire before the normal retirement date shall receive an annual


retirement benefit adjusted in accordance with the following


percentage schedule:


Percentage of Normal


Age Retirement Benefit

Req. No. 1056 Page 7

RBS No. 1056

100.00%


93.33%


86.67%


80.00%


73.33%


66.67%


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1056 RD 12/27/2024 1:43:13 PM































Req. No. 1056 Page 8